South Dakota, session 2026, HB1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-18-16.1 be AMENDED:
12-18-16.1. If an optical scan ballot is used, the voter may use a pencil or other
marking instrument provided must use a black ink ballpoint pen to mark the voter's choice
on the ballot.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.